src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON l13_2 ! mangur
 +A: Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pl_Msc2_Uuml ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um 	# ;
 +A: Sg_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>		# ;
 +A: Pl_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Sg_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pl_Neu2_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pos_Def2	   ;
 
LEXICON l14 ! harður
 +A:ð Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A:ð Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A:ð Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A:ð Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	     # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	     # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>ðum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ðs	 	 # ;
 +A:ð Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A:ð Pos_Def2	  ;
 +A:ð Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l15 ! blíður
 +A:ð Sg_Msc1  ;
 +A:ð Pl_Msc1  ;
 +A:ð Sg_Fem1  ;
 +A:ð Pl_Fem1  ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt	   	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	     # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ðum	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ðs	 	 # ;
 +A:ð Pl_Neu1  ;
 +A:ð Pos_Def  ;
 +A:ð Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l16 ! góður
 +A:góð Sg_Msc1  ;
 +A:góð Pl_Msc1  ;
 +A:góð Sg_Fem1  ;
 +A:góð Pl_Fem1  ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>gott	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>gott	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>góðum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>góðs	 # ; 
 +A:góð Pl_Neu1  ;
 +A:góð Pos_Def  ;
 +A:bet CRi   ;
 +A:be  SRi   ;

LEXICON l17 ! bláur
  l17pos ;
  l17comsup ;

LEXICON l17pos  
 +A: Sg_Msc1  ;
 +A: Pl_Msc1  ;
 +A: Sg_Fem1  ;
 +A: Pl_Fem1  ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt	   	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	     # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 	 # ;
 +A: Pl_Neu1  ;
 +A: Pos_Def  ;

LEXICON l17comsup
 +A: Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l17_1 ! smáur->smærri->smæstur
  l17pos ;
  l17_1comsup ;

LEXICON l17_1comsup
 +A:IUML%>r CRi ;
 +A:IUML SRi	;

LEXICON l18/22
 l18 ;
 l22 ;
 
LEXICON l18 ! keddur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:ddur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:ddan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:ddum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:ds	 	 # ;
 +A:dd Pl_Msc1	 ;
 +A:dd Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A:dd Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ddum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ds	 # ;
 +A:dd Pl_Neu1	;
 +A:dd Pos_Def	;
 +A:dd Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l19 ! nýggjur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:ggjur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:ggjan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:ggjum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:ggj Pl_Msc1	 ;
 +A:ggj Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A:ggj Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ggjum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:ggj Pl_Neu1	;
 +A:ggj Pos_Def	;
 +A:ggj Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l20 ! stillur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:lur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:lan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:lum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:l Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:l Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:l Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>lum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:l Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:l Pos_Def	;
 +A:l Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l20_1 ! lekkur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:kur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:kan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:kum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:k Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:k Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:k Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>kum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:k Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:k Pos_Def	;
 +A:k Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l20_2 ! dyggur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:gur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:gan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:gum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:g Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:g Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:g Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>gum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:g Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:g Pos_Def	;
 +A:g Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l20_3 ! turrur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:rur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:ran	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:rum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:r Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:r Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:r Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>rum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:r Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:r Pos_Def	;
 +A:r Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l20_4 ! sunnur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:nur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:n Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:n Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:n Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>num	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:n Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:n Pos_Def	;
 +A:n Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l20_5 ! fornemmur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:mur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:man	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:mum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:m Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:m Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:m Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>mum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:m Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:m Pos_Def	;
 +A:m Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l20_6 ! vissur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:sur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:san	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:sum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:s Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:s Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:s Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>sum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:s Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:s Pos_Def	;
 +A:s Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l20_7 ! dólgabýttur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:tur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:tan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:tum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:t Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:t Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:t Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>tum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:t Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:t Pos_Def	;
 +A:t Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l21 ! fastur
 +A: Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A: Pl_Msc2_Uuml ;
 +A: Sg_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A: Pl_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A: Sg_Neu3_Uuml ;
 +A: Pl_Neu2_Uuml ;
 +A: Pos_Def2	  ;
 +A: Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l22 ! klæddur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ddur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ddan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ddum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ddum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ds	 # ; 
 +A:dd Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ddum  # ;
 +A:dd Sg_Fem1 ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^ØUML%>dd 	 # ;
 +A:dd Pl_Fem1 ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ddum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ddum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ddum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ds	 # ;
 +A:dd Pl_Neu1 ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ddum	 # ;
 +A:dd Pos_Def3	  ;
 +A:dd Pos_Def	  ;
 +A:dd Comp_Ari	  ;
 
LEXICON l23 ! rættur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ttur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ttan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ttum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ttum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ts	 # ; 
 +A:tt Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ttum  # ;
 +A:tt Sg_Fem1 ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^ØUML%>tt 	 # ;
 +A:tt Pl_Fem1 ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ttum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ttum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ttum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ts	 # ;
 +A:tt Pl_Neu1 ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ttum	 # ;
 +A:tt Pos_Def3	  ;
 +A:tt Pos_Def 	  ;
 +A:tt Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l24/25
l24 ;
l25 ;
