src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
nýggjur:ný l19 ;
intentionellur:intentionel l20 ;
almangur:al#mang l13_2 ;
fjølmangur:fjøl#mang l13_2 ;
mangur:mang l13_2 ;
flogharður:floghar l14 ;
jarnharður:jarnhar l14 ;
stálharður:stálhar l14 ;
vásharður:váshar l14 ;
botnbreiður:botnbrei l15 ;
deyðleiður:deyðlei l15 ;
fagurreyður:fagurrey l15 ;
gestablíður:gestablí l15 ;
hugaglaður:hugagla l15 ;
kuldareyður:kuldarey l15 ;
niðurbreiður:niðurbrei l15 ;
síðumorreyður:síðumorrey l15 ;
treyður:trey l15 ;
dirvisgóður:dirvis# l16 ;
eydnugóður:eydnu# l16 ;
fyndargóður:fyndar# l16 ;
haggóður:hag# l16 ;
holdagóður:holda# l16 ;
kultursgóður:kulturs# l16 ;
matargóður:matar# l16 ;
siðgóður:sið# l16 ;
úrslitagóður:úrslita# l16 ;
blákollubláur:blákollublá l17 ;
dimmbláur:dimmblá l17 ;
eitursmáur:eitur#smá l17_1 ;
ersmáur:er#smá l17_1 ;
evursmáur:evur#smá l17_1 ;
evurssmáur:evurs#smá l17_1 ;
fríur:frí l17 ;
hálvsmáur:hálv#smá l17_1 ;
íbláur:íblá l17 ;
javnsmáur:javn#smá l17_1 ;
krútsmáur:krút#smá l17_1 ;
kølbláur:kølblá l17 ;
morgráur:morgrá l17 ;
regngráur:regngrá l17 ;
skallagráur:skallagrá l17 ;
smáur:smá l17_1 ;
táur:tá l17 ;
ørsmáur:ør#smá l17_1 ;
barnføddur:barnfø l18 ;
deyðmøddur:deyðmø l18 ;
hungursføddur:hungursfø l18 ;
margtýddur:margtý l18 ;
røddur:rø l18 ;
tvítýddur:tvítý l18 ;
alnýggjur:alný l19 ;
brannýggjur:branný l19 ;
foyggjur:foy l19 ;
lýggjur:lý l19 ;
spildurnýggjur:spildurný l19 ;
stríggjur:strí l19 ;
almennur:almen l20_4 ;
árvissur:árvis l20_6 ;
átøkkur:átøk l20_1 ;
beinstinnur:beinstin l20_4 ;
bugfullur:bugful l20 ;
bultjúkkur:bultjúk l20_1 ;
burðardyggur:burðardyg l20_2 ;
deyðkyrrur:deyðkyr l20_3 ;
dimmur:dim l20_5 ;
dólgabýttur:dólgabýt l20_7 ;
dummur:dum l20_5 ;
elddyggur:elddyg l20_2 ;
ellidøkkur:ellidøk l20_1 ;
fingratjúkkur:fingratjúk l20_1 ;
fólkastyggur:fólkastyg l20_2 ;
gagnturrur:gagntur l20_3 ;
góðskufullur:góðskuful l20 ;
gravkvirrur:gravkvir l20_3 ;
greytartjúkkur:greytartjúk l20_1 ;
grimmur:grim l20_5 ;
grummur:grum l20_5 ;
havdimmur:havdim l20_5 ;
høvuðstyggur:høvuðstyg l20_2 ;
illur:il l20 ;
javndimmur:javndim l20_5 ;
javntjúkkur:javntjúk l20_1 ;
knæstinnur:knæstin l20_4 ;
kyrrur:kyr l20_3 ;
mannstyggur:mannstyg l20_2 ;
navnkunnur:navnkun l20_4 ;
neyðfullur:neyðful l20 ;
niðurtjúkkur:niðurtjúk l20_1 ;
nýturrur:nýtur l20_3 ;
óbekvemmur:óbekvem l20_5 ;
ósnøggur:ósnøg l20_2 ;
óvissur:óvis l20_6 ;
pappírstunnur:pappírstun l20_4 ;
sigursvissur:sigursvis l20_6 ;
skítfullur:skítful l20 ;
skráturrur:skrátur l20_3 ;
snøggur:snøg l20_2 ;
steinkvirrur:steinkvir l20_3 ;
tíðarvissur:tíðarvis l20_6 ;
tjúkkur:tjúk l20_1 ;
tortryggur:tortryg l20_2 ;
trinnur:trin l20_4 ;
umsorgarfullur:umsorgarful l20 ;
útgrunnur:útgrun l20_4 ;
vissur:vis l20_6 ;
ymissur:ymis l20_6 ;
dardalatur:dardalat l21 ;
grundarfastur:grundar#fast l21 ;
klófastur:kló#fast l21 ;
lendasvartur:lendasvart l21 ;
ravnsvartur:ravnsvart l21 ;
skerfastur:sker#fast l21 ;
støðufastur:støðu#fast l21 ;
vónbjartur:vónbjart l21 ;
einstaddur:einsta l22 ;
heimastaddur:heimasta l22 ;
miðstaddur:miðsta l22 ;
síðklæddur:síðklæ l22 ;
útistaddur:útista l22 ;
brúnslættur:brúnslæ l23 ;
fjøðurtættur:fjøðurtæ l23 ;
handlættur:handlæ l23 ;
høvuðlættur:høvuðlæ l23 ;
lendafattur:lendafa l23 ;
morgunlættur:morgunlæ l23 ;
spegilsslættur:spegilsslæ l23 ;
vatntættur:vatntæ l23 ;
beinharður:beinhar l14 ;
grótharður:gróthar l14 ;
meitilharður:meitilhar l14 ;
stormharður:stormhar l14 ;
vindharður:vindhar l14 ;
burtursmæddur:burtursmæ l22 ;
kirkjuklæddur:kirkjuklæ l22 ;
sunnudagsklæddur:sunnudagsklæ l22 ;
skønnur:skøn l20_4 ;
fornemmur:fornem l20_5 ;
formellur:formel l20 ;
lekkur:lek l20_1 ;
ruddur:ru l18 ;
libanskur:libansk l24/25 ;
albanskur:albansk l24/25 ;
muhamedanskur:muhamedansk l24/25 ;
koreanskur:koreansk l24/25 ;
julianskur:juliansk l24/25 ;
gregorianskur:gregoriansk l24/25 ;
germanskur:germansk l24/25 ;
fullturrur:full#tur l20_3 ;
avráddur:av#rá l18 ;
bibbaræddur:bibba#ræ l18/22 ;
fólkaræddur:fólka#ræ l18/22 ;
myrkaræddur:myrka#ræ l18/22 ;
deyðaræddur:deyða#ræ l18/22 ;
stangræddur:stang#ræ l18/22 ;
flogræddur:flog#ræ l18/22 ;
kvennræddur:kvenn#ræ l18/22 ;
óræddur:ó#ræ l18/22 ;
samgermanskur:sam#germansk l24/25 ;
